District of Columbia statutes.
38-781.03

Reporting requirements.

Within 30 calendar days after the end of the school year, the Chancellor shall submit to the Office of the State Superintendent of Education the name of each:

(1)

Student who was identified as at risk of retention pursuant to 5-E DCMR § 2200.9 and a description of intervention services provided to the student; and

(2)

Retained student, the underlying reason for the retention decision, and whether the student was identified as at risk of retention pursuant to the requirements of 5-E DCMR § 2200.9.

Feb. 22, 2014, D.C. Law 20-84, § 204, 61 DCR 178